District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1641

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-184, § 101, 39 DCR 8208
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1235, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-241.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 12-261, Title I, § 1236, provided: “Sec. 1236. The Barber and Cosmetology Revision Act of 1992, effective March 17, 1993 (D.C. Law 9-245; D.C. Code § 2-421 et seq. § 3-1801 et seq., 2001 Ed. ), is repealed and authority transferred to the Board of Barber and Cosmetology established by D.C. Code § 47-2853.6 [§ 47-2853.06, 2001 Ed.].”